vi: Kích thước cán ống ngậm: Chuôi trombone bass; Chuôi châu Âu; Chuôi tuba châu Âu; Chuôi lớn; Chuôi vừa; Chuôi nhỏ; Chuôi tuba tiêu chuẩn (Mỹ); Khác
de: Größe des Mundstückschafts: Bassposaunen-Schaft; Euro-Schaft; Europäischer Tuba-Schaft; Großer Schaft; Mittlerer Schaft; Kleiner Schaft; Standard-Tuba-Schaft (Amerikanisch); Sonstige
sl-SI: Velikost stebla ustnika: Nastavek za bas pozavno; Evro nastavek; Evropski nastavek za tubo; Veliki nastavek; Srednji nastavek; Mali nastavek; Standardni (ameriški) nastavek za tubo; Drugo
ro-RO: Dimensiunea tijei muștiucului: Tub de inserție pentru trombon bas; Tub de inserție Euro; Tub de inserție pentru tubă europeană; Tub de inserție mare; Tub de inserție mediu; Tub de inserție mic; Tub de inserție standard (american) pentru tubă; Altele
es: Tamaño del vástago de la boquilla: Tudel de trombón bajo; Tudel europeo; Tudel de tuba europea; Tudel grande; Tudel mediano; Tudel pequeño; Tudel de tuba estándar (americano); Otro
sv: Munstyckesskaft – storlek: Fattning för bastrombon; Euro-fattning; Europeisk tubafattning; Stor fattning; Mediumfattning; Liten fattning; Standard tubafattning (amerikansk); Övrigt
pt-BR: Boquilha haste tamanho: Haste de trombone baixo; Haste europeia; Haste de tuba europeia; Haste grossa; Haste média; Haste fina; Haste de tuba padrão (americana); Outros
bg-BG: Размер на цевта на мундщука: Шанк за бас тромбон; Евро шанк; Европейски шанк за туба; Голям шанк; Среден шанк; Малък шанк; Стандартен (американски) шанк за туба; Друго
en: Mouthpiece shank size: Bass trombone shank; Euro shank; European tuba shank; Large shank; Medium shank; Small shank; Standard (American) tuba shank; Other
zh-CN: 号嘴杆身尺寸: 低音长号柄; 欧式柄; 欧式大号柄; 大柄; 中柄; 小柄; 标准（美式）大号柄; 其他
fi: Suukappaleen varren koko: Bassopasuunan varsi; Euro-varsi; Eurooppalainen tuuban varsi; Iso varsi; Keskikokoinen varsi; Pieni varsi; Standardi (amerikkalainen) tuuban varsi; Muu
da: Skaftstørrelse for mundstykke: Basbasun-skaft; Euro-skaft; Europæisk tubaskaft; Stort skaft; Medium skaft; Lille skaft; Standard (amerikansk) tubaskaft; Andet
ru: Размер ножки мундштука: Хвостовик для бас-тромбона; Евро хвостовик; Европейский хвостовик для тубы; Большой хвостовик; Средний хвостовик; Малый хвостовик; Стандартный (американский) хвостовик для тубы; Другое
nl: Mondstuk schachtmaat: Bastromboneschacht; Euro-schacht; Europese tuba-schacht; Grote schacht; Medium schacht; Kleine schacht; Standaard (Amerikaanse) tuba-schacht; Overig
el: Μέγεθος στελέχους επιστομίου: Επιστόμιο (shank) μπάσου τρομπονιού; Επιστόμιο Euro (shank); Επιστόμιο (shank) ευρωπαϊκής τούμπας; Μεγάλο επιστόμιο (shank); Μεσαίο επιστόμιο (shank); Μικρό επιστόμιο (shank); Τυπικό επιστόμιο (αμερικανικής) τούμπας (shank); Άλλο
pl: Rozmiar trzonka ustnika: Chwyt puzonu basowego; Chwyt europejski (euro); Europejski chwyt tuby; Duży chwyt; Średni chwyt; Mały chwyt; Standardowy (amerykański) chwyt tuby; Inne
it: Bocchino gambo taglia: Codolo per trombone basso; Codolo europeo; Codolo per tuba europea; Codolo largo; Codolo medio; Codolo stretto; Codolo per tuba standard (americano); Altro
nb: Størrelse på munnstykkeskaft: Basstrombone-skaft; Euro-skaft; Europeisk tuba-skaft; Stort skaft; Middels skaft; Lite skaft; Standard (amerikansk) tuba-skaft; Annet
hu: Fúvókaszár mérete: Basszusharsona-csatlakozás; Euro csatlakozás; Európai tuba csatlakozás; Nagy csatlakozás; Közepes csatlakozás; Kis szár; Standard (amerikai) tubaszár; Egyéb
cs: Velikost dříku náustku: Stopka pro basový pozoun; Euro stopka; Evropská stopka pro tubu; Velká stopka; Střední stopka; Malá stopka; Standardní (americká) stopka pro tubu; Jiné
fr: Taille de la tige d’embouchure: Perce trombone basse; Perce européenne; Perce tuba européen; Perce large; Perce moyenne; Perce étroite; Perce standard tuba américain; Autre
th: ขนาดก้านของปากเป่า: แชงก์เบสทรอมโบน; ยูโรแชงก์; แชงก์ทูบายุโรป; แชงก์ขนาดใหญ่; แชงก์ขนาดกลาง; แชงก์ขนาดเล็ก; แชงก์ทูบามาตรฐาน (อเมริกา); อื่นๆ
ja: マウスピースシャンクサイズ: バストロンボーンシャンク; ユーロシャンク; ヨーロピアンチューバシャンク; ラージシャンク; ミディアムシャンク; スモールシャンク; スタンダード (アメリカン) チューバシャンク; その他
lt-LT: Kandiklio koto dydis: Bosinio trombono kotelis; Europos standarto kotelis; Europietiškos tūbos kotelis; Platus kotelis; Vidutinis kotelis; Siauras kotelis; Standartinis (amerikietiškos) tūbos kotelis; Kita
zh-TW: 號嘴柄管尺寸: 低音長號接管; 歐洲接管; 歐洲低音號接管; 大接管; 中接管; 小接管; 標準 (美式) 低音號接管; 其他
hr-HR: Veličina drške usnika: Vrat za bas trombon; Euro vrat; Vrat za europsku tubu; Veliki vrat; Srednji vrat; Mali vrat; Standardni (američki) vrat za tubu; Ostalo
pt-PT: tamanho da haste do bocal: Haste de trombone baixo; Haste europeia; Haste de tuba europeia; Haste grande; Haste média; Haste pequena; Haste de tuba padrão (americana); Outro
sk-SK: Veľkosť stopky náustku: Stopka na basový pozaun; Euro stopka; Európska stopka na tubu; Široká stopka; Stredná stopka; Úzka stopka; Štandardná (americká) stopka na tubu; Iné
ko: 마우스피스 섕크 크기: 베이스 트롬본 섕크; 유로 섕크; 유러피언 튜바 섕크; 라지 섕크; 미디엄 섕크; 스몰 섕크; 표준형(미국식) 튜바 섕크; 기타
tr: Ağızlık şaft boyutu: Bas trombon şaftı; Avrupa (Euro) şaftı; Avrupa tuba şaftı; Büyük şaft; Orta şaft; Küçük şaft; Standart (Amerikan) tuba şaftı; Diğer